Wyoming, session 2026, HB0187.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 22-4-101(b) and 22-4-105 are amended
to read:

22-4-101. Application; composition, election and
qualifications of county central committees; certificate of
election.

(b) The county central committee of each political
party consists of precinct committeemen and committeewomen
HB0187

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0502
elected in the county at the regular biennial primary
election, those who have been properly appointed and
ratified to fill vacancies in the office of precinct
committeeman and committeewoman and the duly elected party
officers in accordance with party bylaws. Except as
provided in subsection (c) of this section, each political
party in each precinct shall elect one (1) committeeman and
one (1) committeewoman for each two hundred fifty (250)
votes or major fraction thereof cast for the party's
candidate for representative in congress in the last
general election, but provided that no precinct shall be
entitled to less than one (1) precinct committeeman and
precinct committeewoman. Precinct committeemen and
committeewomen shall be electors registered in the party
and resident in the precinct. If a precinct boundary line
is changed for any reason, the county commissioners shall
determine the number of precinct committeemen and
committeewomen to which the affected precinct is entitled.

22-4-105. County central committee odd year meeting;
notice; election of chairman, state committeeman and
committeewoman.

HB0187

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0502
The county central committee shall meet at the county seat
each odd-numbered year at a time and place determined by
the county chairman. The county chairman shall publish
notice of the meeting in a newspaper of general circulation
within the county not less than ten (10) days before this
meeting. At the meeting, the county central committee shall
elect the chairman of the county central committee, one (1)
state committeeman and one (1) state committeewoman and
other offices as provided by the party bylaws. A state
political party may provide in its rules for the election
of additional state committeemen and additional state
committeewomen. Neither the chairman, state committeeman or
state committeewoman need be members of the county central
committee but may be pursuant to W.S. 22-4-101(b).

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0187